Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.385

"Totally disabled" defined for certain purposes.

For the purposes of RCW 28B.15.380, the phrase "totally disabled" means a person who has become totally and permanently disabled for life by bodily injury or disease, and is thereby prevented from performing any occupation or gainful pursuit.

[ 2015 c 55 s 214; 2008 c 188 s 2; 2007 c 450 s 3; 1973 1st ex.s. c 191 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1973 1st ex.s. c 191: See note following RCW 28B.15.380.